src/scripts/Polish/numbers.foma
# Copyright (C) 2021 - 2022 Zvonimir Stanecic <zvonimirek222@yandex.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
# thanks to Beqa Gozalishwili for the processing of 1000, 1000000, 1000000000 and such digits

define ProcNumChar [ %-:minus ] ;

define NZDigit 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9;
define Digit %0|NZDigit;
define UnformattedNumber [ Digit Digit^<16];
define DecimalNumber [UnformattedNumber] [Digit | [%. Digit] | [%, Digit]]+ ;
define Number DecimalNumber | UnformattedNumber;

define InsertDot %. @-> kropka || _ ;
define InsertComma %, @-> przecinek || _ ;

define Insertzeros 
[%0] -> zero || [ .#. | %, | %. | [[.#. | %, | %.] %0+]] _ ;

define InsertThousands 
[..] -> tysięcy || Digit _ Digit^3 [.#. | %. | %,] ;

define InsertMillions 
[..] -> milionów || Digit _ Digit^3 tysięcy;

define InsertBillions 
[..] -> miliardów || Digit _ Digit^3 milionów;

define InsertTrillions 
[..] -> bilionów || Digit _ Digit^3 miliardów;

define RemoveSkippedParts 
%0 %0 %0 [tysięcy|milionów|miliardów|bilionów] -> 0 ;

define Units %0:0|1:jeden|2:dwa|3:trzy|4:cztery|5:pięć|6:sześć|7:siedem|8:osiem|9:dziewięć;

define Teens 1:0 [%0:dziesięć|1:jedenaście|2:dwanaście|3:trzynaście|4:czternaście|5:pietnaście|6:szesnaście|7:siedemnaście|8:osiemnaście|9:dziewietnaście];

define Tens %0:0|2:dwadzieścia|3:trzydzieści|4:czterdzieści|5:piędziesiąt|6:sześdziesiąt|7:siedemdziesiąt|8:osiemdziesiąt|9:dziewiędziesiąt;

define Hundreds %0:0|1:sto|2:dwieście|3:trzysta|4:czterysta|5:pięćset|6:sześset|7:siedemset|8:osiemset|9:dziewięćset;

define UpToThousand %0:zero .P. [[(Hundreds) Teens] | [((Hundreds) Tens) Units]];

define DigitsToWords 
UpToThousand @->;

define FixCase 
tysięcy:tysiąc|milionów:milion|miliardów:miliard|bilionów:bilion -> || jeden _ ,, 
tysięcy:tysiące|milionów:miliony|miliardów:miliardy|bilionów:biliony -> || dwa|trzy|cztery _ ; 

define Fix31Tys 
tysiąc:tysięcy|
milion:milionów|
miliard:miliardów|
bilion:bilionów -> || 
[dwadzieścia|trzydzieści|czterdzieści|piędziesiąt|
sześdziesiąt|siedemdziesiąt|osiemdziesiąt|dziewiędziesiąt|
sto|dwieście|trzysta|czterysta|pięćset|sześset|
siedemset|osiemset|dziewięćset] jeden _ ;

define RemoveOne 
jeden -> 0 || [.#. | %. | %,] | GroupName _ tysiąc,, 
jeden -> 0 || [.#. | %. | %,] | GroupName _ milion,, 
jeden -> 0 || [.#. | %. | %,] | GroupName _ miliard,, 
jeden -> 0 || [.#. | %. | %,] | GroupName _ bilion ; 

define ProcNumber Number .o. 
Insertzeros .o. 
InsertThousands .o. 
InsertMillions .o. 
InsertBillions .o. 
InsertTrillions .o. 
RemoveSkippedParts .o. 
DigitsToWords .o. 
FixCase .o. 
RemoveOne .o.
Fix31Tys  .o.
InsertDot .o. InsertComma ;

regex ProcNumChar | ProcNumber;
